North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122D. North Carolina Agricultural Finance Act.
§ 122D-18.
Account and audits.

Subject to the provisions of any contract with the holders of its bonds, the Authority shall establish a system of accounts.

The Authority may cause an independent audit of its books and accounts to be prepared annually and the cost thereof may be paid from any available moneys of the Authority.

By October 1 of each year, the Authority shall submit to the Governor, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division an annual report on the operations of the Authority during the past fiscal year. The annual report shall include a mission statement and a description of the Authority’s activities during the past fiscal year. The Authority shall submit to the Governor, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division a copy of the report of every audit of the books and accounts of the Authority within 60 days after receipt of the report.

History.

1983, c. 789, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1011, s. 1; 1989, c. 500, s. 109(e); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1074, s. 32(b); 2017-57, s. 14.1(ss).

§ 122D-19.
Cooperation of State agencies.

All State officers and agencies may render such services to the Authority within their respective functions as may be requested by the Authority.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1011, s. 1; 1989, c. 500, s. 109(e); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1074, s. 32(b).

§ 122D-20.
Construction of Chapter.

This Chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the State and its residents, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

History.

1983, c. 789, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1011, s. 1; 1989, c. 500, s. 109(e); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1074, s. 32(b).

§ 122D-21.
Termination of the Authority.

In the event of the termination of the Authority, all of its rights, money, assets and revenues in excess of its obligations shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1011, s. 1; 1989, c. 500, s. 109(e); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1074, s. 32(b).

§ 122D-22.
Severability.

The provisions of this Chapter are severable, and if any provision of this Chapter is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions of this Chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision.

History.

1983, c. 789, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1011, s. 1; 1989, c. 500, s. 109(e); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1074, s. 32(b).

§ 122D-23.
Immunity.

There shall be no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature may arise against the members of the Authority for any acts or omission to act by them in the performance of their powers and duties under this Chapter. The immunity established by this section shall not extend to willful neglect or malfeasance that would otherwise be actionable. The immunity established by this section further shall not extend to any act or omission occurring or arising out of the operation of a motor vehicle. The immunity established herein is waived to the extent of any indemnification by insurance for the liability of the members of the authority for which this act otherwise provides immunity.

History.

1987, c. 335, s. 1; 1989, c. 500, s. 109(e); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1074, s. 32(b).